Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.490

County freeholders—Method of filling vacancies.

Vacancies in the position of county freeholder shall be filled with a person qualified for the position who is appointed by majority action of the remaining county freeholders.

[ 1984 c 163 s 1.]